Wisconsin, session 2025, SB304.
do enact as follows:SB304,11Section 1. 6.86 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB304,3,526.86 (1) (b) Except as provided in this section, if application is made by mail, 3the application shall be received no later than 5 p.m. on the 5th day immediately 4preceding the election. If application is made in person, the application shall be 5made no earlier than 14 days preceding the election and no later than the Sunday 6preceding the election. No application may be received on a legal holiday. A The 7office of the municipal clerk or alternate site under s. 6.855 shall be open at least 20 8hours during the period for accepting applications in person, and the municipality 9shall specify the hours in the notice under s. 10.01 (2) (e). The municipal clerk or an 10election official shall witness the certificate for any in-person absentee ballot cast. 11Except as provided in par. (c), if the elector is making written application for an 12absentee ballot at the partisan primary, the general election, the presidential 13preference primary, or a special election for national office, and the application 14indicates that the elector is a military elector, as defined in s. 6.34 (1), the 15application shall be received by the municipal clerk no later than 5 p.m. on election 16day. If the application indicates that the reason for requesting an absentee ballot is 17that the elector is a sequestered juror, the application shall be received no later than 185 p.m. on election day. If the application is received after 5 p.m. on the Friday 19immediately preceding the election, the municipal clerk or the clerk’s agent shall 20immediately take the ballot to the court in which the elector is serving as a juror 21and deposit it with the judge. The judge shall recess court, as soon as convenient, 22and give the elector the ballot. The judge shall then witness the voting procedure as 1provided in s. 6.87 and shall deliver the ballot to the clerk or agent of the clerk who 2shall deliver it to the polling place or, in municipalities where absentee ballots are 3canvassed under s. 7.52, to the municipal clerk as required in s. 6.88. If application 4is made under sub. (2) or (2m), the application may be received no later than 5 p.m. 5on the Friday immediately preceding the election.SB304,26Section 2. 10.01 (2) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB304,4,2710.01 (2) (e) Type E — The type E notice shall state the qualifications for 8absentee voting, the procedures for obtaining an absentee ballot in the case of 9registered and unregistered voters, the places and the deadlines for application and 10return of application, including any alternate site under s. 6.855, and the specific 11office hours, totalling not less than 20, during which an elector without prior 12appointment may cast an absentee ballot in the municipal clerk’s office or at an 13alternate site under s. 6.855. The municipal clerk shall publish a type E notice on 14the 4th Tuesday preceding each spring primary and election, on the 4th Tuesday 15preceding each partisan primary and general election, on the 4th Tuesday 16preceding the primary for each special national, state, county or municipal election 17if any, on the 4th Tuesday preceding a special county or municipal referendum, and 18on the 3rd Tuesday preceding each special national, state, county or municipal 19election to fill an office which is not held concurrently with the spring or general 20election. The clerk of each special purpose district which calls a special election 21shall publish a type E notice on the 4th Tuesday preceding the primary for the 22special election, if any, on the 4th Tuesday preceding a special referendum, and on 1the 3rd Tuesday preceding a special election for an office which is not held 2concurrently with the spring or general election except as authorized in s. 8.55 (3).SB304,4,33